Massachusetts, session 194th, H4031.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 74 of the acts of 2020, An Act Providing for the Appointment of
Retired Police Officers as Special Police Officers in the Town of Weston, is hereby amended by
striking out in section 7 the number "65" in both instances in which it appears and inserting in
place thereof the number:- 70.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1